North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-32 Interstate Pest Control Compact [Repealed]

4-32-01.
Enactment of Interstate Compact on Pest Control. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-32-02.
Cooperation with insurance fund. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-32-03.
Filing bylaws. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-32-04.
Compact administrator. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-32-05.
Applications for assistance. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-32-06.
Service of notices. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-32-07.
Funding programs. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-32-08.
Executive head defined. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 77, § 8; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-32-09.
Effective date. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 54, § 15.